Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5986.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-8-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-8 entitled "Medical
Assistance" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-8-19. Rates of payment to nursing facilities.
(a) Rate reform.
(1) The rates to be paid by the state to nursing facilities licensed pursuant to chapter 17 of
title 23, and certified to participate in Title XIX of the Social Security Act for services rendered to
Medicaid-eligible residents, shall be reasonable and adequate to meet the costs that must be
incurred by efficiently and economically operated facilities in accordance with 42 U.S.C. §
1396a(a)(13). The executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) shall
promulgate or modify the principles of reimbursement for nursing facilities in effect as of July 1,
2011, to be consistent with the provisions of this section and Title XIX, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.,
of the Social Security Act.
(2) The executive office shall review the current methodology for providing Medicaid
payments to nursing facilities, including other long-term care services providers, and is authorized
to modify the principles of reimbursement to replace the current cost-based methodology rates with
rates based on a price-based methodology to be paid to all facilities with recognition of the acuity
of patients and the relative Medicaid occupancy, and to include the following elements to be
developed by the executive office:
(i) A direct-care rate adjusted for resident acuity;

(ii) An indirect-care and other direct-care rate comprised of a base per diem for all facilities;
(iii) Revision of rates as necessary based on increases in direct and indirect costs beginning
October 2024 utilizing data from the most recent finalized year of facility cost report. The per diem
rate components deferred in subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be adjusted
accordingly to reflect changes in direct and indirect care costs since the previous rate review;
(iv) Application of a fair-rental value system;
(v) Application of a pass-through system; and
(vi) Adjustment of rates by the change in a recognized national nursing home inflation
index to be applied on October 1 of each year, beginning October 1, 2012. This adjustment will not
occur on October 1, 2013, October 1, 2014, or October 1, 2015, but will occur on April 1, 2015.
The adjustment of rates will also not occur on October 1, 2017, October 1, 2018, October 1, 2019,
and October 2022. Effective July 1, 2018, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2017, both fee-for-
service and managed care, will be increased by one and one-half percent (1.5%) and further
increased by one percent (1%) on October 1, 2018, and further increased by one percent (1%) on
October 1, 2019. Effective October 1, 2022, rates paid to nursing facilities from the rates approved
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and in effect on October 1, 2021, both fee-for-
service and managed care, will be increased by three percent (3%). In addition to the annual nursing
home inflation index adjustment, there shall be a base rate staffing adjustment of one-half percent
(0.5%) on October 1, 2021, one percent (1.0%) on October 1, 2022, and one and one-half percent
(1.5%) on October 1, 2023. The inflation index shall be applied without regard for the transition
factors in subsections (b)(1) and (b)(2). For purposes of October 1, 2016, adjustment only, any rate
increase that results from application of the inflation index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii)
shall be dedicated to increase compensation for direct-care workers in the following manner: Not
less than 85% of this aggregate amount shall be expended to fund an increase in wages, benefits,
or related employer costs of direct-care staff of nursing homes. For purposes of this section, direct-
care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs), certified nursing
assistants (CNAs), certified medical technicians, housekeeping staff, laundry staff, dietary staff, or
other similar employees providing direct-care services; provided, however, that this definition of
direct-care staff shall not include: (i) RNs and LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees”
under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or (ii) CNAs, certified medical
technicians, RNs, or LPNs who are contracted, or subcontracted, through a third-party vendor or
staffing agency. By July 31, 2017, nursing facilities shall submit to the secretary, or designee, a
certification that they have complied with the provisions of this subsection (a)(2)(vi) with respect
LC001540 - Page 2 of 6

to the inflation index applied on October 1, 2016. Any facility that does not comply with the terms
of such certification shall be subjected to a clawback, paid by the nursing facility to the state, in the
amount of increased reimbursement subject to this provision that was not expended in compliance
with that certification.
(3) Commencing on October 1, 2021, eighty percent (80%) of any rate increase that results
from application of the inflation index to subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall be
dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the following manner on
October 1, of each year.
(i) For purposes of this subsection, compensation increases shall include base salary or
hourly wage increases, benefits, other compensation, and associated payroll tax increases for
eligible direct-care workers. This application of the inflation index shall apply for Medicaid
reimbursement in nursing facilities for both managed care and fee-for-service. For purposes of this
subsection, direct-care staff shall include registered nurses (RNs), licensed practical nurses (LPNs),
certified nursing assistants (CNAs), certified medication technicians, licensed physical therapists,
licensed occupational therapists, licensed speech-language pathologists, mental health workers
who are also certified nurse assistants, physical therapist assistants, housekeeping staff, laundry
staff, dietary staff, or other similar employees providing direct-care services; provided, however
that this definition of direct-care staff shall not include:
(A) RNs and LPNs who are classified as “exempt employees” under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.); or
(B) CNAs, certified medication technicians, RNs, or LPNs who are contracted or
subcontracted through a third-party vendor or staffing agency.
(4)(i) By July 31, 2021, and July 31 of each year thereafter, nursing facilities shall submit
to the secretary or designee a certification that they have complied with the provisions of subsection
(a)(3) of this section with respect to the inflation index applied on October 1. The executive office
of health and human services (EOHHS) shall create the certification form nursing facilities must
complete with information on how each individual eligible employee’s compensation increased,
including information regarding hourly wages prior to the increase and after the compensation
increase, hours paid after the compensation increase, and associated increased payroll taxes. A
collective bargaining agreement can be used in lieu of the certification form for represented
employees. All data reported on the compliance form is subject to review and audit by EOHHS.
The audits may include field or desk audits, and facilities may be required to provide additional
supporting documents including, but not limited to, payroll records.
(ii) Any facility that does not comply with the terms of certification shall be subjected to a
LC001540 - Page 3 of 6

clawback and twenty-five percent (25%) penalty of the unspent or impermissibly spent funds, paid
by the nursing facility to the state, in the amount of increased reimbursement subject to this
provision that was not expended in compliance with that certification.
(iii) In any calendar year where no inflationary index is applied, eighty percent (80%) of
the base rate staffing adjustment in that calendar year pursuant to subsection (a)(2)(vi) of this
section shall be dedicated to increase compensation for all eligible direct-care workers in the
manner referenced in subsections (a)(3)(i), (a)(3)(i)(A), and (a)(3)(i)(B) of this section.
(b) Transition to full implementation of rate reform. For no less than four (4) years after
the initial application of the price-based methodology described in subsection (a)(2) to payment
rates, the executive office of health and human services shall implement a transition plan to
moderate the impact of the rate reform on individual nursing facilities. The transition shall include
the following components:
(1) No nursing facility shall receive reimbursement for direct-care costs that is less than
the rate of reimbursement for direct-care costs received under the methodology in effect at the time
of passage of this act; for the year beginning October 1, 2017, the reimbursement for direct-care
costs under this provision will be phased out in twenty-five-percent (25%) increments each year
until October 1, 2021, when the reimbursement will no longer be in effect; and
(2) No facility shall lose or gain more than five dollars ($5.00) in its total, per diem rate the
first year of the transition. An adjustment to the per diem loss or gain may be phased out by twenty-
five percent (25%) each year; except, however, for the years beginning October 1, 2015, there shall
be no adjustment to the per diem gain or loss, but the phase out shall resume thereafter; and
(3) The transition plan and/or period may be modified upon full implementation of facility
per diem rate increases for quality of care-related measures. Said modifications shall be submitted
in a report to the general assembly at least six (6) months prior to implementation.
(4) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the twelve-month (12) period beginning
July 1, 2015, Medicaid payment rates for nursing facilities established pursuant to this section shall
not exceed ninety-eight percent (98%) of the rates in effect on April 1, 2015. Consistent with the
other provisions of this chapter, nothing in this provision shall require the executive office to restore
the rates to those in effect on April 1, 2015, at the end of this twelve-month (12) period.
(5) There is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise
appropriated for the fiscal year 2026, the sum of thirty three million three hundred thousand dollars
($33,300,000), of which fourteen million four hundred fifteen thousand ninety-seven dollars
($14,415,097) shall come from general revenues and eighteen million eight hundred eighty-four
thousand nine hundred three dollars ($18,884,903) shall come from available federal funds, thereby
LC001540 - Page 4 of 6

reducing Medicaid managed care and increasing Medicaid nursing facility rates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001540
========
LC001540 - Page 5 of 6